Tennessee, session 114, HB0327.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 4, Chapter 1, Part 4, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
In celebration of the 250th anniversary of the signing of the Declaration of
Independence, the date upon which Thomas Jefferson wrote that "life, liberty, and the
pursuit of happiness" are among the unalienable rights of all citizens:
(1) The month of June shall be known as the "Celebration of Life" month;
HB0327
002042
- 1 -

(2) The month of July shall be known as the "Celebration of Liberty"
month; and
(3) The month of August shall be known as the "Celebration of the
Pursuit of Happiness" month.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 002042